Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.045

Examining board—Generally.

The board shall meet at least once each year and at such other times as the board deems appropriate to properly discharge its duties. All meetings shall be held in Olympia, Washington, or such other places as may be designated by the secretary. Five members of the board shall constitute a quorum, except that oral examinations may be conducted with only three psychologist members. A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

[ 2022 c 240 s 11; 1991 c 3 s 195; 1984 c 279 s 77.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.